isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Cv Y 53
SFX Cv eti l .
SFX Cv eti la .
SFX Cv eti lo .
SFX Cv eti li .
SFX Cv reti eru .
SFX Cv reti erem .
SFX Cv reti ereš .
SFX Cv reti ere .
SFX Cv reti eremo .
SFX Cv reti erete .
SFX Cv reti erut .
SFX Cv ti h .
SFX Cv ti še .
SFX Cv ti hmo .
SFX Cv ti ste .
SFX Cv ti hu .
SFX Cv reti eri .
SFX Cv reti erimo .
SFX Cv reti erite .
SFX Cv reti eruči .
SFX Cv reti eručego .
SFX Cv reti eručemu .
SFX Cv reti eručim .
SFX Cv reti eručem .
SFX Cv reti eručih .
SFX Cv reti eručimi .
SFX Cv reti eruča .
SFX Cv reti eruču .
SFX Cv reti eručej .
SFX Cv reti eručeju .
SFX Cv reti eruče .
SFX Cv reti eremy .
SFX Cv reti eremogo .
SFX Cv reti eremomu .
SFX Cv reti eremym .
SFX Cv reti eremom .
SFX Cv reti eremo .
SFX Cv reti erema .
SFX Cv reti eremu .
SFX Cv reti eremoj .
SFX Cv reti eremoju .
SFX Cv reti eremi .
SFX Cv reti ereme .
SFX Cv reti eremyh .
SFX Cv reti eremym .
SFX Cv reti eremymi .
SFX Cv eti ši .
SFX Cv eti ša .
SFX Cv eti še .
SFX Cv eti ty .
SFX Cv eti ta .
SFX Cv eti to .
SFX Cv eti tje .

SFX Cw Y 4
SFX Cw a 0 .
SFX Cw 0 h .
SFX Cw 0 m .
SFX Cw 0 mi .

SFX Cx Y 12
SFX Cx j 0 .
SFX Cx oj a .
SFX Cx j go .
SFX Cx oj u .
SFX Cx j m .
SFX Cx j mu .
SFX Cx oj ym .
SFX Cx 0 u .
SFX Cx oj i .
SFX Cx oj e .
SFX Cx oj yh .
SFX Cx oj ymi .

SFX Cy Y 10
SFX Cy 0 ta .
SFX Cy 0 te .
SFX Cy 0 t .
SFX Cy 0 ti .
SFX Cy 0 tu .
SFX Cy 0 tah .
SFX Cy 0 tam .
SFX Cy 0 tem .
SFX Cy 0 tom .
SFX Cy 0 tami .

SFX Cz Y 4
SFX Cz e 0 .
SFX Cz e ah .
SFX Cz e am .
SFX Cz e ami .

SFX DA Y 12
SFX DA es se .
SFX DA es sa .
SFX DA es sego .
SFX DA es su .
SFX DA es sej .
SFX DA es sem .
SFX DA es semu .
SFX DA es sim .
SFX DA es seju .
SFX DA es si .
SFX DA es sih .
SFX DA es simi .

SFX DB Y 71
SFX DB i l .
SFX DB i la .
SFX DB i lo .
SFX DB i li .
SFX DB i u .
SFX DB i em .
SFX DB i eš .
SFX DB i e .
SFX DB i emo .
SFX DB i ete .
SFX DB i ut .
SFX DB i eh .
SFX DB i eše .
SFX DB i ehmo .
SFX DB i este .
SFX DB i ehu .
SFX DB 0 mo .
SFX DB 0 te .
SFX DB i uči .
SFX DB i učego .
SFX DB i učemu .
SFX DB i učim .
SFX DB i učem .
SFX DB i učih .
SFX DB i učimi .
SFX DB i uča .
SFX DB i uču .
SFX DB i učej .
SFX DB i učeju .
SFX DB i uče .
SFX DB i omy .
SFX DB i omogo .
SFX DB i omomu .
SFX DB i omym .
SFX DB i omom .
SFX DB i omo .
SFX DB i oma .
SFX DB i omu .
SFX DB i omoj .
SFX DB i omoju .
SFX DB i omi .
SFX DB i ome .
SFX DB i omyh .
SFX DB i omym .
SFX DB i omymi .
SFX DB i omo .
SFX DB i ši .
SFX DB i ša .
SFX DB i še .
SFX DB i eny .
SFX DB i enogo .
SFX DB i enomu .
SFX DB i enym .
SFX DB i enom .
SFX DB i eni .
SFX DB i ene .
SFX DB i enyh .
SFX DB i enymi .
SFX DB i ena .
SFX DB i enu .
SFX DB i enoj .
SFX DB i enoju .
SFX DB i eno .
SFX DB i enje .
SFX DB i enja .
SFX DB i enju .
SFX DB i enjem .
SFX DB i enij .
SFX DB i enjam .
SFX DB i enjami .
SFX DB i enjah .

SFX DC Y 80
SFX DC ti l .
SFX DC ti la .
SFX DC ti lo .
SFX DC ti li .
SFX DC nati onu .
SFX DC nati onem .
SFX DC nati oneš .
SFX DC nati one .
SFX DC nati onemo .
SFX DC nati onete .
SFX DC nati onut .
SFX DC ti h .
SFX DC ti še .
SFX DC ti hmo .
SFX DC ti ste .
SFX DC ti hu .
SFX DC nati oni .
SFX DC nati onimo .
SFX DC nati onite .
SFX DC nati onuči .
SFX DC nati onučego .
SFX DC nati onučemu .
SFX DC nati onučim .
SFX DC nati onučem .
SFX DC nati onučih .
SFX DC nati onučimi .
SFX DC nati onuča .
SFX DC nati onuču .
SFX DC nati onučej .
SFX DC nati onučeju .
SFX DC nati onuče .
SFX DC nati onemy .
SFX DC nati onemogo .
SFX DC nati onemomu .
SFX DC nati onemym .
SFX DC nati onemom .
SFX DC nati onemo .
SFX DC nati onema .
SFX DC nati onemu .
SFX DC nati onemoj .
SFX DC nati onemoju .
SFX DC nati onemi .
SFX DC nati oneme .
SFX DC nati onemyh .
SFX DC nati onemym .
SFX DC nati onemymi .
SFX DC ti vši .
SFX DC ti všego .
SFX DC ti všemu .
SFX DC ti všim .
SFX DC ti všem .
SFX DC ti vših .
SFX DC ti všimi .
SFX DC ti vša .
SFX DC ti všu .
SFX DC ti všej .
SFX DC ti všeju .
SFX DC ti vše .
SFX DC ti ny .
SFX DC ti nogo .
SFX DC ti nomu .
SFX DC ti nym .
SFX DC ti nom .
SFX DC ti ni .
SFX DC ti ne .
SFX DC ti nyh .
SFX DC ti nymi .
SFX DC ti na .
SFX DC ti nu .
SFX DC ti noj .
SFX DC ti noju .
SFX DC ti no .
SFX DC ti nje .
SFX DC ti nja .
SFX DC ti nju .
SFX DC ti njem .
SFX DC ti nij .
SFX DC ti njam .
SFX DC ti njami .
SFX DC ti njah .

SFX DD Y 8
SFX DD enj nje .
SFX DD enj nja .
SFX DD enj njev .
SFX DD enj nju .
SFX DD enj njah .
SFX DD enj njam .
SFX DD enj njem .
SFX DD enj njami .

SFX DE Y 4
SFX DE to-nebud ego-nebud .
SFX DE to-nebud em-nebud .
SFX DE to-nebud emu-nebud .
SFX DE to-nebud im-nebud .

SFX DF Y 9
SFX DF en ny .
SFX DF en na .
SFX DF en nov .
SFX DF en nu .
SFX DF en nah .
SFX DF en nam .
SFX DF en nom .
SFX DF en nami .
SFX DF en ne .

SFX DG Y 8
SFX DG elj lje .
SFX DG elj lja .
SFX DG elj ljev .
SFX DG elj lju .
SFX DG elj ljah .
SFX DG elj ljam .
SFX DG elj ljem .
SFX DG elj ljami .

SFX DH Y 16
SFX DH j 0 .
SFX DH enj ni .
SFX DH enj nje .
SFX DH enj ne .
SFX DH enj nja .
SFX DH enj nev .
SFX DH enj njev .
SFX DH enj nju .
SFX DH enj nah .
SFX DH enj njah .
SFX DH enj nam .
SFX DH enj njam .
SFX DH enj nem .
SFX DH enj njem .
SFX DH enj nami .
SFX DH enj njami .

SFX DI Y 69
SFX DI  se 0 .
SFX DI ti se l .
SFX DI ti se la .
SFX DI ti se lo .
SFX DI ti se li .
SFX DI ati se u .
SFX DI ati se im .
SFX DI ati se iš .
SFX DI ati se i .
SFX DI ati se imo .
SFX DI ati se ite .
SFX DI ati se et .
SFX DI ti se h .
SFX DI ti se še .
SFX DI ti se hmo .
SFX DI ti se ste .
SFX DI ti se hu .
SFX DI ati se eči .
SFX DI ati se eča .
SFX DI ati se eče .
SFX DI ati se imy .
SFX DI ati se imogo .
SFX DI ati se imomu .
SFX DI ati se imym .
SFX DI ati se imom .
SFX DI ati se imo .
SFX DI ati se ima .
SFX DI ati se imu .
SFX DI ati se imoj .
SFX DI ati se imoju .
SFX DI ati se imi .
SFX DI ati se ime .
SFX DI ati se imyh .
SFX DI ati se imym .
SFX DI ati se imymi .
SFX DI ti se vši .
SFX DI ti se všego .
SFX DI ti se všemu .
SFX DI ti se všim .
SFX DI ti se všem .
SFX DI ti se vših .
SFX DI ti se všimi .
SFX DI ti se vša .
SFX DI ti se všu .
SFX DI ti se všej .
SFX DI ti se všeju .
SFX DI ti se vše .
SFX DI ti se ny .
SFX DI ti se nogo .
SFX DI ti se nomu .
SFX DI ti se nym .
SFX DI ti se nom .
SFX DI ti se ni .
SFX DI ti se ne .
SFX DI ti se nyh .
SFX DI ti se nymi .
SFX DI ti se na .
SFX DI ti se nu .
SFX DI ti se noj .
SFX DI ti se noju .
SFX DI ti se no .
SFX DI ti se nje .
SFX DI ti se nja .
SFX DI ti se nju .
SFX DI ti se njem .
SFX DI ti se nij .
SFX DI ti se njam .
SFX DI ti se njami .
SFX DI ti se njah .

SFX DJ Y 80
SFX DJ ti l .
SFX DJ ti la .
SFX DJ ti lo .
SFX DJ ti li .
SFX DJ rati eru .
SFX DJ rati erem .
SFX DJ rati ereš .
SFX DJ rati ere .
SFX DJ rati eremo .
SFX DJ rati erete .
SFX DJ rati erut .
SFX DJ ti h .
SFX DJ ti še .
SFX DJ ti hmo .
SFX DJ ti ste .
SFX DJ ti hu .
SFX DJ rati eri .
SFX DJ rati erimo .
SFX DJ rati erite .
SFX DJ rati eruči .
SFX DJ rati eručego .
SFX DJ rati eručemu .
SFX DJ rati eručim .
SFX DJ rati eručem .
SFX DJ rati eručih .
SFX DJ rati eručimi .
SFX DJ rati eruča .
SFX DJ rati eruču .
SFX DJ rati eručej .
SFX DJ rati eručeju .
SFX DJ rati eruče .
SFX DJ rati eremy .
SFX DJ rati eremogo .
SFX DJ rati eremomu .
SFX DJ rati eremym .
SFX DJ rati eremom .
SFX DJ rati eremo .
SFX DJ rati erema .
SFX DJ rati eremu .
SFX DJ rati eremoj .
SFX DJ rati eremoju .
SFX DJ rati eremi .
SFX DJ rati ereme .
SFX DJ rati eremyh .
SFX DJ rati eremym .
SFX DJ rati eremymi .
SFX DJ ti vši .
SFX DJ ti všego .
SFX DJ ti všemu .
SFX DJ ti všim .
SFX DJ ti všem .
SFX DJ ti vših .
SFX DJ ti všimi .
SFX DJ ti vša .
SFX DJ ti všu .
SFX DJ ti všej .
SFX DJ ti všeju .
SFX DJ ti vše .
SFX DJ ti ny .
SFX DJ ti nogo .
SFX DJ ti nomu .
SFX DJ ti nym .
SFX DJ ti nom .
SFX DJ ti ni .
SFX DJ ti ne .
SFX DJ ti nyh .
SFX DJ ti nymi .
SFX DJ ti na .
SFX DJ ti nu .
SFX DJ ti noj .
SFX DJ ti noju .
SFX DJ ti no .
SFX DJ ti nje .
SFX DJ ti nja .
SFX DJ ti nju .
SFX DJ ti njem .
SFX DJ ti nij .
SFX DJ ti njam .
SFX DJ ti njami .
SFX DJ ti njah .
