isv_lat_hunspell_dict.dic
dreti/Cv
usta/Cw
tutoj/Cx
jagne/Cy
droždže/Cz
klěšče/Cz
ves/DA
izrasti/DB
izgnati/DC
penj/DD
čto-nebud/DE
buben/DF
gnati/DC
kašelj/DG
denj/DH
sostojati se/DI
brati/DJ
vrata/Cw
tamtoj/Cx
bojati se/DI
toj/Cx
kartofelj/DG
rasti/DB
stupenj/DD
uravenj/DD
izbrati/DJ
kabelj/DG
jajca/Cw
nožice/Cz
medija/Cw
dějanja/Cw
dvojčeta/Cw
poldenj/DD
popoldenj/DD
prěrasti/DB
razbrati/DJ
tydenj/DD
zarasti/DB
jetra/Cw
lěta/Cw
tele/Cy
dvojče/Cy
ptače/Cy
šesterčeta/Cw
trojčeta/Cw
prase/Cy
žrěbe/Cy
velikdenj/DD
děvče/Cy
dorasti/DB
vozrasti/DB
četverčeta/Cw
peterčeta/Cw
guslje/Cz
držati se/DI
financije/Cz
kate/Cy
nabrati/DJ
nastavjenja/Cw
zadržati se/DI
onoj/Cx
odbrati/DJ
okolice/Cz
razdreti/Cv
nogavice/Cz
papuče/Cz
porasti/DB
zabrati/DJ
dognati/DC
drva/Cw
grabje/Cz
guse/Cy
jelene/Cy
kabare/Cy
kote/Cy
ljve/Cy
lise/Cy
medvědže/Cy
mlade/Cy
nagnati/DC
narasti/DB
obrasti/DB
oddreti/Cv
orle/Cy
osle/Cy
razgnati/DC
razkričati se/DI
vakacije/Cz
ščene/Cy
srdca/Cw
prati/DJ
izprati/DJ
sopelj/DG
obdreti/Cv
sdreti/Cv
naočila/Cw
prisposobjenja/Cw
vnuče/Cy
podbrati/DJ
sanje/Cz
zimbabve/Cy
